Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

Forensic Services

33-7-301. Evaluation of accused believed incompetent to stand trial — Judicial hospitalization proceedings — Recovery report.

When a defendant charged with a criminal offense is believed to be incompetent to stand trial, or there is a question about the defendant's mental capacity at the time of the commission of the crime, the criminal, circuit, or general sessions court judge may, upon the judge's own motion or upon petition by the district attorney general or by the attorney for the defendant and after hearing, order the defendant to be evaluated on an outpatient basis. The evaluation shall be done by the community mental health center or licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner to serve the court or, if the evaluation cannot be made by the center or the private practitioner, on an outpatient basis by the state hospital or the state-supported hospital designated by the commissioner to serve the court. If, and only if, the outpatient evaluator concludes that further evaluation and treatment are needed, the court may order the defendant hospitalized, and if in a department facility, in the custody of the commissioner for not more than thirty (30) days for further evaluation and treatment for competence to stand trial subject to the availability of suitable accommodations.

At any stage of a felony criminal proceeding, including a pretrial hearing, trial, sentencing, or post-conviction proceeding, the state may move or petition the court to authorize the district attorney general to designate a qualified expert to examine the defendant if the defendant gives notice that the defendant intends to offer testimony about the defendant's mental condition, whether in support of a defense of insanity or for any other purpose. The court may authorize the district attorney general to designate a qualified expert, who is willing to be appointed, to examine the defendant, if:

An inpatient evaluator under subdivision (a)(1) notifies the court in a pretrial proceeding that the type or extent of assessment required exceeds the expertise or resources available to the evaluator or exceeds the scope of analysis of the defendant's competence to stand trial, satisfaction of criteria for the insanity defense, or for commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title; or

In any other type of felony criminal proceeding, the court determines that examination of the defendant by a qualified expert for the state is necessary to adjudicate fairly the matter before it.

The amount and payment of expert fees shall be determined and paid by the state district attorneys general conference.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B), during the post-conviction stage of a criminal proceeding, if it is believed that a defendant is incompetent to assist counsel in preparation for, or otherwise participate in, the post-conviction proceeding, the court may, upon its own motion, order that the defendant be evaluated on either an outpatient or inpatient basis, as may be appropriate. If the defendant is indigent, the amount and payment of the costs for the evaluation shall be determined and paid for by the administrative office of the courts. If the defendant is not indigent, the cost of the evaluation shall be charged as court costs. If the evaluation cannot be done on an outpatient basis and if it is necessary to hospitalize the defendant in a department facility, hospitalization shall not be for more than thirty (30) days and shall be subject to available suitable accommodations. Prior to transporting a defendant for such evaluation and treatment in a department facility, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving department facility has available suitable accommodations. Any costs incurred by the administrative office of the courts shall be absorbed within the current appropriation for the indigent defense fund.

In a post-conviction proceeding in a capital case, if there is a question on the defendant's mental condition at the time of the commission of the crime when there has been no such prior evaluation or a question as to whether the defendant is intellectually disabled, the court may, upon its own motion or upon petition by the district attorney general or by the attorney for the defendant, and, if the matter is contested, after a hearing, order that the defendant be evaluated on an outpatient basis. If and only if the outpatient evaluator concludes that an inpatient evaluation is necessary, the court may order the defendant to be hospitalized for not more than thirty (30) days.

Prior to transporting a defendant for such evaluation and treatment in a department facility, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving department facility has available suitable accommodations.

If the court determines on the basis of the mental health evaluation and other relevant evidence:

That the defendant is incompetent to stand trial because of mental illness; or

That the defendant is competent to stand trial but that the failure to hospitalize would create a likelihood to cause the defendant serious harm by reason of mental illness; and

The defense attorney agrees with those findings, the district attorney general or the attorney for the defense may petition the criminal court before which the case is pending or that would hear the case, if the defendant were bound over to the grand jury to conduct proceedings for judicial hospitalization under chapter 6, part 5 of this title.

Either party may demand a jury trial on the issues.

The court is vested with jurisdiction to conduct the proceedings.

In the proceedings the court shall determine, in addition to the findings required by chapter 6, part 5 of this title, whether the defendant is substantially likely to injure the defendant or others if the defendant is not treated in a forensic services unit and whether treatment is in the defendant's best interest.

If the court enters an order of judicial hospitalization, the defendant shall be transferred to the custody of the commissioner, and if the court finds in addition that the defendant is substantially likely to injure the defendant or others if the defendant is not treated in a forensic services unit and that treatment in the unit is in the defendant's best interests, the defendant shall be transferred to the custody of the commissioner at a forensic services unit designated by the commissioner. If the court commits a person under this subsection (b), the person comes into the commissioner's custody only if the forensic services unit has available suitable accommodations; provided, that, if there are no suitable available accommodations at the time of the determination, then the commissioner shall expeditiously find a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource to accommodate the person upon the availability of suitable available accommodations. Prior to transporting a defendant for such commitment, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving facility has available suitable accommodations.

When a defendant admitted under subsection (b) has been hospitalized for six (6) months, and at six-month intervals thereafter, the chief officer of the hospital shall file a written report with the clerk of the court by whose order the defendant was confined and shall give a copy of the report to the defendant, the defendant's attorney, the defendant's legal guardian or conservator, if any, and to the district attorney general. The chief officer shall also send a copy of the report to the defendant’s parent, adult child, or spouse, whichever is appropriate, but at least one (1) of the three (3). The report shall detail the chief officer's best judgment as to the defendant's prospects for recovery, the defendant's present condition, the time required for relevant kinds of recovery, and whether there is substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial in the foreseeable future. This reporting obligation shall cease at the point that misdemeanor charges are retired for defendants with no other charges in accordance with subsection (d).

If a defendant is found to be incompetent to stand trial, any misdemeanor charges pending at the time of the incompetency determination shall be retired no later than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days after the date of arrest when the misdemeanor charge or charges have not otherwise been disposed of except that no misdemeanor charges shall be retired pursuant to this subsection (d) if the defendant is restored to competency prior to the date on which the misdemeanor charge or charges would have otherwise been retired under this subsection (d).

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 26; 1977, ch. 386, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 12; T.C.A., § 33-708; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 26; 1987, ch. 143, § 4; 1998, ch. 978, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 51; 2005, ch. 260, § 1; 2009, ch. 419, § 1; 2009, ch. 531, §§ 44, 46, 47; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2013, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 7, §§ 33-7-101 — 33-7-103, 33-7-201 — 33-7-203, 33-7-301 — 33-7-303 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 22, 26, 27; 1977, ch. 386, § 1; 1979, ch. 311, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 224, § 17; 1982, ch. 862, § 12; 1983, ch. 323, § 23; T.C.A., §§ 33-701, 33-704, 33-708, 33-709 33-711 — 33-715; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 35-38; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 26-28; 1987, ch. 143, § 4; 1998, ch. 978, §§ 1, 2), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 12.3, 14.3, 14.4, 14.7, 14.8, 14.10, 14.16, 14.17, 14.24.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 3-11-1, 3-12.2-4, 3-12.2-5.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, §§ 18—20.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1977-1978, III. Defenses (Joseph G. Cook), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 490 (1979).

Trial Rights and Psychotropic Drugs: The Case Against Administering Involuntary Medications to a Defendant During Trial, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 165 (2002).

Attorney General Opinions. Judicial powers of hospitalization, OAG 84-126, 1984 Tenn. AG LEXIS 222 (4/17/84).

33-7-302. Determination and notice of restored competence to stand trial.

When the chief officer determines that a defendant in a state hospital or treatment resource who is charged with a crime is restored to competence to stand trial, the chief officer shall give notice of that fact to the clerk of the court by whose order the defendant was confined and deliver the defendant to the sheriff of the county from which the defendant was admitted.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-712; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-7-303. Judicial hospitalization or outpatient treatment of person judged not guilty by reason of insanity — Transfer to forensic services unit — Appeal — Cost of treatment.

When a person charged with a criminal offense is acquitted of the charge on a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the commission of the offense, the criminal court shall immediately order the person to be diagnosed and evaluated on an outpatient basis. The evaluation shall be performed by the community mental health agency or licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner to serve the court.

When a person charged with a felony criminal offense under title 39, chapter 13, is found not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the commission of the offense and that person is in custody at the time of the verdict, the court may order that the person remain held without bond following the verdict, for the purpose of receiving an outpatient evaluation performed by the community mental health agency or licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner to serve the court. In such cases, the court shall immediately enter an order to hold the person without bond for the purpose of receiving the evaluation and shall order that the evaluation be completed within thirty (30) days of receipt of the court order by the examining professional.

Following diagnosis and evaluation, if certification is provided that the person is committable under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, the district attorney general shall file a complaint in the criminal court for judicial commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title. If certification is not provided that the person is committable under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, the district attorney general shall file a complaint in the criminal court for an order requiring the person to participate in outpatient treatment under this subsection (b).

If the court does not commit the person under chapter 6, part 5 of this title and the court determines that the person's condition resulting from mental illness is likely to deteriorate rapidly to the point that the person will pose a substantial likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 unless treatment is continued, the court may order the person to participate in outpatient treatment. Otherwise, the court may not order the person to participate in outpatient treatment. The obligation to participate in outpatient treatment continues until it is terminated by the court under subdivision (b)(4).

If the court orders the person to participate in outpatient treatment and the person does not comply with the treatment plan, the qualified mental health professional shall notify the district attorney general of the noncompliance, and the district attorney general may move the criminal court to cite the person for civil or criminal contempt of court for the noncompliance and may file a complaint in the criminal court under chapter 6, part 5 of this title. The qualified mental health professional shall file a report with the district attorney general every six (6) months as to the person's continuing need for treatment.

The court shall terminate the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment when it determines that the person is no longer subject to the obligation under subdivision (b)(2).

The court is vested with jurisdiction to conduct proceedings authorized by this subsection (b).

Following the hearing conducted by the criminal court under chapter 6, part 5, of this title, if the court finds that the person meets the commitment standards under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, the court shall enter an order of judicial hospitalization and transfer the person to the custody of the commissioner subject to department rules governing release procedures.

If the court further finds that:

The person is substantially likely to injure the person or others if the person is not treated in a forensic services unit; and

Treatment in the unit is in the person's best interests, the person shall be transferred into the custody of the commissioner at a forensic services unit designated by the commissioner subject to the provisions of § 33-7-203.

If the court commits a person under this subsection (c), the person comes into the commissioner's custody only if the commissioner determines that a facility has available suitable accommodations; provided, that, if there are no suitable available accommodations at the time of the determination, then the commissioner shall expeditiously find a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource to accommodate the person upon the availability of suitable available accommodations. Prior to transporting a defendant for commitment in a department facility, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving facility has available suitable accommodations.

Either party may appeal a final adjudication under this section to the court of criminal appeals.

The criminal court, in a trial before a jury in which the issue of insanity at the time of the commission of the offense is raised, shall instruct the jury before it begins deliberation as to the provisions of this section.

The cost of treatment incurred as a result of the outpatient treatment and evaluation required in subdivision (b)(2) shall be taxed as court costs.

When a person charged with first degree murder or a Class A felony offense under title 39, chapter 13, is found not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the commission of the offense, the trial court shall immediately order the person to be diagnosed and evaluated on an outpatient basis. The evaluation shall be performed by the community mental health agency or licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner to serve the trial court to determine if the person should be committed to inpatient hospitalization under chapter 6, part 5 of this title. If the person was in custody at the time of the verdict, the trial court shall immediately order the person to remain held without bond following the verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity, for purposes of receiving the outpatient evaluation. The trial court shall order that the outpatient evaluation be completed within thirty (30) days of receipt of the court order by the examining community mental health agency or licensed private practitioner.

If, after outpatient evaluation, the person is committed to inpatient hospitalization under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, the person shall only be discharged from inpatient hospitalization subject to a court order by the trial court to participate in outpatient treatment.

If, after outpatient evaluation, the person is not committed to inpatient hospitalization under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, the trial court shall order the person to participate in outpatient treatment.

Any person currently committed to inpatient hospitalization under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, who was charged with first degree murder or a Class A felony offense under title 39, chapter 13, and found not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the commission of the offense, shall only be discharged from inpatient hospitalization subject to a court order by the trial court to participate in outpatient treatment.

Any person ordered by the trial court to participate in outpatient treatment under this subsection (g) shall do so for an initial mandatory period of six (6) months. Upon completion of the initial six-month period, the trial court shall review the person's need for continued court-ordered outpatient treatment. If the trial court determines that continued outpatient treatment is appropriate, then the trial court may order the continuation of outpatient treatment beyond the initial six (6) month period. Thereafter, the trial court shall review the person's need for continued court-ordered outpatient treatment on an annual basis. The trial court shall consider the following factors when determining the appropriateness of ordering a person to continued outpatient treatment beyond the initial six-month period under this subsection (g):

The likelihood that harm will occur unless the person remains under court-ordered outpatient treatment;

The likelihood that the person will voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment;

The person's history of compliance with outpatient treatment plans; and

Any other factor that the trial court deems appropriate for purposes of evaluating the person's need for court-ordered outpatient treatment.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1977, ch. 396, § 1; 1979, ch. 311, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 224, § 17; 1983, ch. 323, § 23; T.C.A., § 33-709; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 38; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 27, 28; 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 52; 2005, ch. 150, § 3; 2009, ch. 531, §§ 48-51; 2011, ch. 142, § 1; 2017, ch. 342, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (a)(2) which read, “(2) When a person charged with a felony criminal offense under title 39, chapter 13, offenses against person, is acquitted of the charge on a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the commission of the offense and when that person is detained at the time of the acquittal, the court may order that the person remain detained following the verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity, for the purpose of receiving an outpatient evaluation performed by the community mental health agency or licensed private practitioner designated by the commissioner to serve the court. In such cases, the court shall immediately enter an order to detain the person for the purpose of receiving this evaluation and shall order that the evaluation be completed within thirty (30) days of receipt of the court order by the examining professional.”; and added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 342, § 3. July 1, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 28.50, 28.49.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, §§ 19, 21.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1976-1977 — A Critical Survey, III. Defenses (Joseph G. Cook), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 18 (1978).

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1977-1978, III. Defenses (Joseph G. Cook), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 490 (1979).

Special Project: Drugs and Criminal Responsibility, 33 Vand. L. Rev. 1145 (1980).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of proposed “guilty but excused from responsibility” verdict, OAG 99-116, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 116 (5/14/99).

After a finding of “not guilty by reason of insanity” in a trial in general sessions court, the court has jurisdiction to order the 60 to 90 day (now 30 day) evaluation required by T.C.A. § 33-7-303, but only in misdemeanor cases where the defendant waives in writing an indictment, presentment, grand jury investigation, and jury trial and the district attorney general does not object, OAG 01-041, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (3/19/01).

33-7-304. Cost of evaluation and treatment — Court-ordered inpatient evaluation to be completed within thirty days of admission.

The cost of evaluation and treatment under this part, if the defendant is charged with a misdemeanor, will be a charge upon the funds of the county. If the court finds the defendant financially able to pay all or part of the costs and expenses for the evaluation and treatment, the court may order the defendant to pay all or part of the costs and expenses. Payment shall be made to the clerk of the general sessions court for remittance to the person, agency or facility to whom compensation is due, or if the costs and expenses have been paid by the county, to the appropriate office of the county.

Costs of the care or treatment of any defendant ordered by the court and who is charged with a misdemeanor shall be paid by the state only when specifically authorized by law.

Where a court orders a defendant charged with a misdemeanor to be evaluated under § 33-7-301(a), the court shall order that any inpatient evaluation be completed within thirty (30) days of admission to the facility.

Acts 2009, ch. 531, § 45; 2012, ch. 997, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Attorney General Opinions. County's responsibility for payment of court-ordered mental health evaluations. OAG 10-13, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 13 (2/2/10).

County's responsibility for payment of court-ordered mental health evaluations. OAG 11-76, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (11/1/11).